Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.060

Sale of shares not sold in subscription offering—Methods—Conditions.

Any shares of the converting savings bank not sold in the subscription offering shall either be sold in a public offering through an underwriter or directly by the converting savings bank in a direct community marketing, subject to the applicant demonstrating to the director the feasibility of the method of sale and to such conditions as may be provided in the plan of conversion. The conditions shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) A condition limiting purchases by each officer and director or their associates in this phase of the offering to one-tenth of one percent of the total offering of shares.

(2) A condition limiting purchases by any person and that person's associates in this phase of the offering to a number of shares or a percentage of the total offering so long as the limitation does not exceed two percent of the shares to be sold in the total offering.

(3) A condition that any direct community offering by the converting savings bank shall give a preference to natural persons residing in the counties in which the savings bank has an office. The methods by which preference shall be given shall be approved by the director.

[ 1994 c 92 s 356; 1981 c 85 s 11.]